Louisiana, session 2026, HB594.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. R.S. 1:58.10 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
6 §58.10. SCN2A Day
7 A. February twenty-fourth is designated as SCN2A Day throughout the state
8 of Louisiana.
9 B. This Section shall be known and may be cited as the "Emily Katherine
10 Dedon Act" in memory of the beautiful young child whose passing highlighted the
11 need for awareness of SCN2A.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.